North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 3. Hog Cholera.

§ 106-310.
Burial of hogs dying natural death required.

It shall be the duty of every person, firm, or corporation who shall lose a hog by any form of natural death to have the same buried in the earth to a depth of at least two feet within 12 hours after the death of the animal. Any person, firm, or corporation that shall fail to comply with the terms of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than ten dollars ($10.00) for each offense, at the discretion of the court.

History.

1915, c. 225; C.S., s. 4877; 1993, c. 539, s. 764; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-311.
Hogs affected with cholera to be segregated and confined.

If any person having swine affected with the disease known as hog cholera, or any other infectious or contagious disease, who discovers the same, or to whom notice of the fact shall be given, shall fail or neglect for one day to secure the diseased swine from the approach of or contact with other hogs not so affected, by penning or otherwise securing and effectually isolating them so that they shall not have access to any ditch, canal, branch, creek, river or other watercourse which passes beyond the premises of the owners of such swine, he shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1889, c. 173, s. 1; 1891, c. 67, ss. 1, 3; 1899, c. 47; 1903, c. 106; Rev., s. 3297; 1913, c. 120; C.S., s. 4490; 1993, c. 539, s. 765; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Cross References.

As to confinement and isolation of diseased animals, see

G.S. 106-402

.

§ 106-312.
Shipping hogs from cholera-infected territory.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation in any district or territory infected by cholera to bring, carry, or ship hogs into any stock-law section or territory, unless such hogs have been certified to be free from cholera either by the farm demonstration agent of the county or some other suitable person to be designated by the clerk of the superior court. Any violation of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1917, c. 203; C.S., s. 4491; 1993, c. 539, s. 766; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-313.
Price of serum to be fixed.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall fix the price of anti-hog-cholera serum at such an amount as will cover the cost of production.

History.

1917, c. 275, s. 1; 1919, c. 6; C.S., s. 4878; 1997-261, s. 50.

Cross References.

As to purchase for resale by Department of Agriculture, see

G.S. 106-307.1

.

§ 106-314.
Manufacture and use of serum and virus restricted.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to distribute, sell, or use in the State anti-hog-cholera serum unless said anti-hog-cholera serum is produced at the serum plant of the State Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or produced in a plant which is licensed by the Biological Products Licensing Section, Animal Inspection and Quarantine Division, Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, allowing said plant to do an interstate business.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to distribute, sell, or use in the State of North Carolina, virulent blood from hog-cholera-infected hogs, or virus, unless said virulent blood, or virus, is produced at the serum plant of the State Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services or produced in a plant which is licensed by the Biological Products Licensing Section, Animal Inspection and Quarantine Division, Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, allowing said plant to do an interstate business. No virulent blood from hog-cholera-infected hogs, or virus, shall be distributed, sold or used in the State unless and until permission has been given in writing by the State Veterinarian for such distribution, sale or use. Said permission to be cancelled by the State Veterinarian when necessary.

Any person, firm, or corporation guilty of violating the provisions of this section or failing or refusing to comply with the requirements thereof shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1915, c. 88; 1919, c. 125, ss. 1, 2, 3; C.S., s. 4879; 1959, c. 576, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 767; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-261, s. 109.

Local Modification.

Currituck: 1943, c. 199; Edgecombe: 1933, c. 139; Hyde: 1943, c. 693; Nash: 1935, cc. 67, 222; Pasquotank: 1943, c. 358; Pitt: 1935, c. 352; Tyrrell: 1943, c. 693; Wilson: 1933, c. 58.

Cross References.

As to purchase for resale by Department of Agriculture, see

G.S. 106-307.1

.

§ 106-315.
Written permit from State Veterinarian for sale, use or distribution of hog-cholera virus, etc.

No hog-cholera virus or other product containing live virus or organisms of animal diseases shall be distributed, sold, or used within the State unless permission has been given in writing by the State Veterinarian for such distribution, sale, or use, said permission to be cancelled by the State Veterinarian when he deems same necessary.

History.

1939, c. 360, s. 5; 1959, c. 576, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Currituck: 1943, c. 199; Hyde: 1943, c. 693; Pasquotank: 1943, c. 358; Tyrrell: 1943, c. 693.

§ 106-316.
Counties authorized to purchase and supply serum.

If the county commissioners of any county in the State deem it necessary to use anti-hog-cholera serum to control or eradicate the disease known as hog cholera, they are authorized within their discretion to purchase from the State Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services sufficient anti-hog-cholera serum and virus for use in their county and supply same free of cost to the residents of the county, or pay for any portion of the cost of said serum, the remaining portion to be paid by the owners of the hogs.

The use of anti-hog-cholera serum and virus and the quarantine of diseased animals shall remain under the supervision of the State Veterinarian.

Nothing in this section shall in any way interfere with existing laws and regulations covering the use of anti-hog-cholera serum and virus and the quarantine and control of contagious diseases, or any laws or regulations that may become necessary in the future.

History.

1919, c. 132; C.S., s. 4881; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-316.1.
Purpose of §§ 106-316.1 to 106-316.5.

It is the purpose and intent of

G.S. 106-316.1

to 106-316.5 to safeguard the swine industry in North Carolina through a program designed to prevent the spread of hog cholera by prohibiting and restricting the use of virulent hog-cholera virus; to provide for the use of modified live virus hog-cholera vaccines that have been licensed as such by the Biological Products Licensing Section, Animal Inspection and Quarantine Division, Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture; to empower the State Board of Agriculture to establish rules and regulations and the Commissioner of Agriculture to establish emergency rules and regulations governing the movement of hogs into the State from other states and within the State; to establish rules and regulations designating the minimum dosage of anti-hog-cholera serum and antibody concentrate that shall be used in combination with modified live-virus hog-cholera vaccines on swine vaccinated at public livestock markets and other places; and to establish such other rules and regulations and emergency rules and regulations as may be necessary for carrying out the purposes of

G.S. 106-316.1

to 106-316.5.

History.

1955, c. 824, s. 1; 1959, c. 576, s. 3.

§ 106-316.2.
Use of virulent hog-cholera virus prohibited without permit; virulent hog-cholera virus defined; use of modified live virus vaccines.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, either general, public-local, special or private, and except as herein provided, the possession, sale and use of virulent hog-cholera virus in North Carolina is hereby prohibited. Virulent hog-cholera virus referred to in this section means any unattended hog-cholera virus collected directly or indirectly from blood or other tissues of swine infected with hog cholera which has not been licensed as a modified live virus hog-cholera vaccine. The State Veterinarian may issue a permit authorizing the sale, possession and use of virulent hog-cholera virus only for the purpose of laboratory diagnosis; official research programs; production of anti-hog-cholera serum, antibody concentrate, modified live virus, killed virus vaccine, and similar biological products; and following a declaration that a state of emergency exists in a designated quarantined hog-cholera area or areas within the State by the Commissioner of Agriculture of North Carolina. The use of virulent hog-cholera virus during a declared state of emergency shall be under the direct supervision of the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative. Modified live-virus hog-cholera vaccines that have been licensed as such by the Biological Products Licensing Section, Animal Inspection and Quarantine Division, Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture may be sold and used in compliance with the General Statutes of North Carolina and the rules, regulations, definitions and standards adopted by the North Carolina Board of Agriculture and the emergency rules and regulations established by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

1955, c. 824, s. 2; 1959, c. 576, s. 4.

§ 106-316.3.
Unlawful to import hogs inoculated with virulent virus; exceptions for immediate slaughter; health certificate and permit required.

It shall be unlawful to bring hogs into North Carolina that have been inoculated with virulent hog-cholera virus less than 30 days prior to the date of entry, except for immediate slaughter, and in addition thereto the transportation or importation of such hogs that have been inoculated with virulent hog-cholera virus must be accompanied by the health certificate and permit as required by the rules and regulations of the North Carolina Board of Agriculture or emergency rules and regulations of the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to be in conflict with or to repeal any provisions of

G.S. 106-317

through 106-322 or any other statute or rule or regulation prohibiting, restricting or controlling the interstate movement of hogs for other reasons.

History.

1955, c. 824, s. 3; 1959, c. 576, s. 5.

§ 106-316.4.
Penalties for violation of §§ 106-316.1 to 106-316.5.

Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of

G.S. 106-316.1

to 106-316.5 shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1955, c. 824, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 768; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-316.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1084, s. 2.

§ 106-317.
Regulation of the transportation or importation of hogs and other livestock into State.

To prevent the spread of hog cholera, vesicular exanthema, vesicular stomatitis, foot-and-mouth disease, or any other contagious, infectious and communicable swine disease in North Carolina, the North Carolina Board of Agriculture is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations governing the transportation and importation of swine into North Carolina from any other state or territory: Provided, that following a proclamation by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States and the Commissioner of Agriculture of North Carolina that a state of emergency exists, arising from the existence of a dangerous contagious and infectious disease of livestock which threatens the livestock industry of the country, the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture is empowered and authorized to immediately promulgate emergency rules and regulations governing the movement of swine and other livestock within the State and prohibiting, restricting and/or controlling the transportation and importation of swine and other livestock into North Carolina for the duration of the emergency. The emergency rules and regulations promulgated by the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture shall be subject to approval, disapproval or change at the next regular or special meeting of the North Carolina Board of Agriculture. The North Carolina Board of Agriculture under the authority of this section may by regulation establish a system of health certificates and permits for the better protection of the swine and livestock of this State.

History.

1941, c. 373, s. 1; 1955, c. 424, s. 1.

§ 106-318.
Issuance of health certificates for swine and livestock; inspection.

Such health certificates that may be required under the rules and regulations by the Board of Agriculture or the emergency rules and regulations of the Commissioner of Agriculture shall be issued by a State, federal or duly licensed veterinarian in the state of origin certifying that the swine or other livestock transported and imported are healthy and not infected with or exposed to a contagious, infectious or communicable swine or other livestock disease, and all permits required under such rules and regulations shall be in possession of the owner or agent in charge, at all times until delivery of such swine or other livestock, and upon request, the owner or agent in charge shall produce said required certificate and permit for inspection by any police or peace officer or inspection agent of this State or any county thereof. The burden shall be on the person transporting said swine or other livestock to prove the origin, identity and destination of such swine and other livestock.

History.

1941, c. 373, s. 2; 1955, c. 424, s. 2.

§ 106-319.
Burial of hogs and other livestock dying in transit.

It shall be the duty of any owner or agent having in charge any swine or other livestock imported or transported into this State who shall, before delivery lose a hog or other livestock from natural or unnatural death to have the same delivered to a rendering plant or buried in the area to a depth of at least two feet within 12 hours after death of said swine or other livestock.

History.

1941, c. 373, s. 3; 1955, c. 424, s. 3.

§ 106-320.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1084, s. 2.

§ 106-321.
Penalties for violation.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall violate any provision set forth in this Article or any rule or regulation duly established by the State Board of Agriculture or emergency rules and regulations established by the Commissioner of Agriculture shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1941, c. 373, s. 5; 1955, c. 424, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 769; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-322.
Effect of §§ 106-317 to 106-322.

Sections 106-317 to 106-322 shall not repeal Article 34, Chapter 106, but shall be complementary thereto.

History.

1941, c. 373, s. 6.

§ 106-322.1.
State-federal hog-cholera cooperative agreements; establishment of hog-cholera eradication areas.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to enter into cooperative State-federal agreements with the United States Department of Agriculture for the purpose of State-federal programs for the control and eradication of hog-cholera. The Commissioner of Agriculture may designate individual counties or two or more counties as hog-cholera eradication areas.

History.

1963, c. 1084, s. 1.

§ 106-322.2.
Destruction of swine affected with or exposed to hog cholera; indemnity payments.

If it appears in the judgment of the State Veterinarian to be necessary for the control and eradication of hog cholera to destroy or slaughter swine affected with or exposed to such disease, the State Veterinarian is authorized to order said swine destroyed or slaughtered, notwithstanding the wishes of the owners of said swine, provided that if the owner contests the diagnosis of hog cholera he shall be entitled to a review of the case by a licensed practicing veterinarian, the State Veterinarian, or his authorized representative, and the federal inspector in charge, or his authorized representative, to determine that a diagnosis of hog cholera was arrived at by the use of accepted, standard diagnostic techniques. The State Veterinarian is authorized to agree on the part of the State, in the case of swine destroyed or slaughtered on account of being affected with hog cholera or exposure to same to pay one half of the difference between the appraised value of each animal destroyed or slaughtered and the value of the salvage thereof; provided, that the State indemnity shall not be in excess of the indemnity payments made by the federal cooperating agency; provided further, that State indemnity payments shall be restricted to swine located on the farm or feedlot of the owner or authorized representative of the owner; provided further, that in no case shall any payments by the State be more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for any grade swine nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for any purebred swine and subject to available State funds. The procedure for appraisal, disposal and salvage of slaughtered or destroyed swine shall be carried out in the same manner as that required under the General Statutes of North Carolina governing compensation for killing other diseased animals provided, however, that the appraisal may be made by the owner, or his representative, and the State Veterinarian, or his authorized representative, when agreement on the appraised value of the swine can be made; provided, further, that swine which entered the State 30 days or more before developing symptoms of hog cholera may be appraised in the same manner as swine which originate in North Carolina.

For the purposes of this section, “purebred swine” shall mean any swine upon which a certificate of pure breeding has been issued by a purebred swine association, or swine not more than 12 months of age eligible to receive such a certificate.

History.

1963, c. 1084, s. 1; 1967, c. 105; 1969, c. 525, ss. 1, 2.

§ 106-322.3.
When indemnity payments not to be made.

No payments shall be made for any swine slaughtered in the following cases:

If the owner does not clean up and disinfect premises as directed by an inspector of the Animal Health Division, Agricultural Research Service, United States Department of Agriculture or the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative;

Where the owner has not complied with the livestock disease control laws and regulations applicable to hog cholera;

For swine in a herd in which hog-cholera vaccine has been used illegally on one or more animals in the herd;

Swine involved in an outbreak in which the existence of hog cholera has not been confirmed by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative;

Swine belonging to the United States or the State of North Carolina;

Swine brought into the State in violation of State laws or regulations;

Swine which the claimant knew to be affected with hog cholera, or had notice thereof, at the time they came into his possession;

Swine which have not been within the State of North Carolina for at least 30 days prior to discovery of the disease;

Where the owner does not use reasonable care in protecting swine from exposure to hog cholera;

Where the owner has failed to submit the reports required by the United States Department of Agriculture and the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for animals on which indemnity is paid under Article 34.

Swine purchased by a buying station for slaughter which are not slaughtered within 10 days of purchase.

History.

1969, c. 525, s. 21/2; 1997-261, s. 51.